Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DULUTH ENTERTAINMENT AND CONVENTION CENTER (DECC).new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $7,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center Authority to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip improvements and betterments of a capital nature at the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center facility. This appropriation includes money for elevator and escalator improvements; energy efficiency upgrades, including victaulic fitting replacements; Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) compliance improvements, seat replacement, and flooring upgrades in Symphony Hall; sound wall and room divider replacement in Pioneer Hall and Paulucci Hall; fire door replacements in Fitzgerald Hall and Amsoil Arena; emergency door replacements in Pioneer Hall; and parking lot repairs. This appropriation is exempt from the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.86, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $7,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end